District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1504

Decedent’s estate — Secreting or converting property, documents, or assets.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(t), (u), 29 DCR 3976

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1404, 22-1405.